Illinois, session 104th, HB1441.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-3.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3.5)7    Sec. 11-74.4-3.5. Completion dates for redevelopment 8projects.9    (a) Unless otherwise stated in this Section, the estimated 10dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 11retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 12project costs (including refunding bonds under Section 1311-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the year in 14which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as provided in 15subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, is to be made 16with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 23rd calendar 17year after the year in which the ordinance approving the 18redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance was 19adopted on or after January 15, 1981.20    (a-5) If the redevelopment project area is located within 21a transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 22Section 11-74.4-3, the estimated dates of completion of the 23redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to   HB1441 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 2under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 3the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as 4provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, 5is to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 635th calendar year after the year in which the ordinance 7approving the redevelopment project area was adopted. 8    (a-7) A municipality may adopt tax increment financing for 9a redevelopment project area located in a transit facility 10improvement area that also includes real property located 11within an existing redevelopment project area established 12prior to August 12, 2016 (the effective date of Public Act 1399-792). In such case: (i) the provisions of this Division 14shall apply with respect to the previously established 15redevelopment project area until the municipality adopts, as 16required in accordance with applicable provisions of this 17Division, an ordinance dissolving the special tax allocation 18fund for such redevelopment project area and terminating the 19designation of such redevelopment project area as a 20redevelopment project area; and (ii) after the effective date 21of the ordinance described in (i), the provisions of this 22Division shall apply with respect to the subsequently 23established redevelopment project area located in a transit 24facility improvement area. 25    (b) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 26project and retirement of obligations issued to finance   HB1441 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 2Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 3year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 4provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 5to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 6calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 7the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 8was adopted on September 9, 1999 by the Village of Downs. 9    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 10project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 11redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 12Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 13year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 14provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 15to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 33rd 16calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 17the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 18was adopted on May 20, 1985 by the Village of Wheeling.19    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 20project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 21redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 22Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 23year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 24provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 25to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 28th 26calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving   HB1441 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 2was adopted on October 12, 1989 by the City of Lawrenceville. 3    (b-5) The estimated dates of completion of the 4redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 5finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 6under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 7the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 8provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 9to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 10calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 11the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 12was adopted on April 19, 2004 by the Village of Tremont. 13    (c) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 14project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 15redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 16Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 17year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 18provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 19to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 35th 20calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 21the redevelopment project area was adopted:22        (1) If the ordinance was adopted before January 15, 23    1981.24        (2) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1983, 25    April 1984, July 1985, or December 1989.26        (3) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1987 and   HB1441 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    the redevelopment project is located within one mile of 2    Midway Airport.3        (4) If the ordinance was adopted before January 1, 4    1987 by a municipality in Mason County.5        (5) If the municipality is subject to the Local 6    Government Financial Planning and Supervision Act or the 7    Financially Distressed City Law.8        (6) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1984 by 9    the Village of Rosemont.10        (7) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 11    by a municipality located in Clinton County for which at 12    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 13    June 17, 1997, or if the ordinance was adopted on December 14    31, 1986 by a municipality with a population in 1990 of 15    less than 3,600 that is located in a county with a 16    population in 1990 of less than 34,000 and for which at 17    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 18    June 17, 1997.19        (8) If the ordinance was adopted on October 5, 1982 by 20    the City of Kankakee, or if the ordinance was adopted on 21    December 29, 1986 by East St. Louis.22        (9) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1991 23    by the Village of Sauget.24        (10) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 1985 25    by the City of Rock Island.26        (11) If the ordinance was adopted before December 18,   HB1441 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    1986 by the City of Moline.2        (12) If the ordinance was adopted in September 1988 by 3    Sauk Village.4        (13) If the ordinance was adopted in October 1993 by 5    Sauk Village.6        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 7    by the City of Galva.8        (15) If the ordinance was adopted in March 1991 by the 9    City of Centreville.10        (16) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 1991 11    by the City of East St. Louis.12        (17) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 13    by the City of Aledo.14        (18) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1990 15    by the City of Clinton.16        (19) If the ordinance was adopted on September 6, 1994 17    by the City of Freeport.18        (20) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 19    by the City of Tuscola.20        (21) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 21    by the City of Sparta.22        (22) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 23    by the City of Beardstown.24        (23) If the ordinance was adopted on April 27, 1981, 25    October 21, 1985, or December 30, 1986 by the City of 26    Belleville.  HB1441 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (24) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 2    by the City of Collinsville.3        (25) If the ordinance was adopted on September 14, 4    1994 by the City of Alton.5        (26) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1996 6    by the City of Lexington.7        (27) If the ordinance was adopted on November 5, 1984 8    by the City of LeRoy.9        (28) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1991 or 10    June 3, 1992 by the City of Markham.11        (29) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1986 12    by the City of Pekin.13        (30) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1981 14    by the City of Champaign.15        (31) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 16    by the City of Urbana.17        (32) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 18    by the Village of Heyworth.19        (33) If the ordinance was adopted on February 24, 1992 20    by the Village of Heyworth.21        (34) If the ordinance was adopted on March 16, 1995 by 22    the Village of Heyworth.23        (35) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 24    by the Town of Cicero.25        (36) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 26    by the City of Effingham.  HB1441 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (37) If the ordinance was adopted on May 9, 1991 by the 2    Village of Tilton.3        (38) If the ordinance was adopted on October 20, 1986 4    by the City of Elmhurst.5        (39) If the ordinance was adopted on January 19, 1988 6    by the City of Waukegan.7        (40) If the ordinance was adopted on September 21, 8    1998 by the City of Waukegan.9        (41) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 10    by the City of Sullivan.11        (42) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1991 12    by the City of Sullivan.13        (43) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 14    by the City of Oglesby.15        (44) If the ordinance was adopted on July 28, 1987 by 16    the City of Marion.17        (45) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 1990 by 18    the City of Marion.19        (46) If the ordinance was adopted on August 20, 1985 20    by the Village of Mount Prospect.21        (47) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1998 22    by the Village of Woodhull.23        (48) If the ordinance was adopted on April 20, 1993 by 24    the Village of Princeville.25        (49) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1986 by 26    the City of Granite City.  HB1441 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (50) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1989 2    by the Village of Lombard.3        (51) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 4    by the Village of Gardner.5        (52) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1999 by 6    the Village of Paw Paw.7        (53) If the ordinance was adopted on November 17, 1986 8    by the Village of Franklin Park.9        (54) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 1989 10    by the Village of South Holland.11        (55) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1992 by 12    the Village of Riverdale.13        (56) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 14    by the City of Galesburg.15        (57) If the ordinance was adopted on April 1, 1985 by 16    the City of Galesburg.17        (58) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1990 by 18    the City of West Chicago.19        (59) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 20    by the City of Oak Forest.21        (60) If the ordinance was adopted in 1999 by the City 22    of Villa Grove.23        (61) If the ordinance was adopted on January 13, 1987 24    by the Village of Mt. Zion.25        (62) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 26    by the Village of Manteno.  HB1441 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (63) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 2    the City of Chicago Heights.3        (64) If the ordinance was adopted on January 6, 1999 4    by the Village of Rosemont.5        (65) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 2000 6    by the Village of Stone Park.7        (66) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 8    by the City of DeKalb.9        (67) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1986 10    by the City of Aurora. 11        (68) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 12    by the Village of Milan.13        (69) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 1994 14    by the City of West Frankfort.15        (70) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 16    by the Village of Libertyville.17        (71) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 18    by the Village of Hoffman Estates. 19        (72) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 20    1986 by the Village of Sherman. 21        (73) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 22    by the City of Macomb.23        (74) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 24    the City of East Peoria to create the West Washington 25    Street TIF.26        (75) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by   HB1441 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    the City of East Peoria to create the Camp Street TIF. 2        (76) If the ordinance was adopted on August 7, 2000 by 3    the City of Des Plaines.4        (77) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 5    by the City of Washington to create the Washington Square 6    TIF #2.7        (78) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 8    by the City of Morris. 9        (79) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 10    the Village of Steeleville.11        (80) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 12    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I (the Main St TIF).13        (81) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 14    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF II (the Interstate 15    TIF). 16        (82) If the ordinance was adopted on November 6, 2002 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Madden/Wells TIF 18    District. 19        (83) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 20    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Racine TIF 21    District. 22        (84) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 23    the City of Chicago to create the Stony Island 24    Commercial/Burnside Industrial Corridors TIF District. 25        (85) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 1989 26    by the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Mall TIF   HB1441 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    District.2        (86) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 1986 3    by the City of Mendota. 4        (87) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 5    by the Village of Cahokia.6        (88) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 7    1999 by the City of Belleville.8        (89) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 9    by the Village of Bellevue to create the Bellevue TIF 10    District 1.11        (90) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 1993 12    by the Village of Crete.13        (91) If the ordinance was adopted on February 12, 2001 14    by the Village of Crete.15        (92) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 2001 by 16    the Village of Crete.17        (93) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 18    by the City of Champaign. 19        (94) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 1986 20    by the City of Charleston. 21        (95) If the ordinance was adopted on June 6, 1989 by 22    the Village of Romeoville. 23        (96) If the ordinance was adopted on October 14, 1993 24    and amended on August 2, 2010 by the City of Venice. 25        (97) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1994 by 26    the City of Markham.   HB1441 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (98) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1998 by 2    the Village of Bensenville. 3        (99) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1987 4    by the City of Dixon. 5        (100) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 6    1988 by the Village of Lansing. 7        (101) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1998 8    by the City of Moline. 9        (102) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1991 by 10    the Village of Glenwood. 11        (103) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1992 12    by the City of East Peoria. 13        (104) If the ordinance was adopted on December 14, 14    1998 by the City of Carlyle.15        (105) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000, as 16    subsequently amended, by the City of Chicago to create the 17    Midwest Redevelopment TIF District. 18        (106) If the ordinance was adopted on September 13, 19    1989 by the City of Chicago to create the Michigan/Cermak 20    Area TIF District. 21        (107) If the ordinance was adopted on March 30, 1992 22    by the Village of Ohio. 23        (108) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 24    the Village of Orangeville.25        (109) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 26    1997 by the Village of Germantown.   HB1441 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (110) If the ordinance was adopted on April 28, 2003 2    by Gibson City. 3        (111) If the ordinance was adopted on December 18, 4    1990 by the Village of Washington Park, but only after the 5    Village of Washington Park becomes compliant with the 6    reporting requirements under subsection (d) of Section 7    11-74.4-5, and after the State Comptroller's certification 8    of such compliance. 9        (112) If the ordinance was adopted on February 28, 10    2000 by the City of Harvey.11        (113) If the ordinance was adopted on January 11, 1991 12    by the City of Chicago to create the Read/Dunning TIF 13    District. 14        (114) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 1991 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Sanitary and Ship Canal 16    TIF District. 17        (115) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 18    by the City of Naperville. 19        (116) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2002 by 20    the Village of Arlington Heights. 21        (117) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 22    1991 by the Village of Machesney Park. 23        (118) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 24    1993 by the City of Ottawa. 25        (119) If the ordinance was adopted on June 4, 1991 by 26    the Village of Lansing.   HB1441 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (120) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 2    2004 by the Village of Fox Lake.3        (121) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 4    1992 by the City of Fairfield.5        (122) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 6    1992 by the City of Mt. Sterling. 7        (123) If the ordinance was adopted on March 15, 2004 8    by the City of Batavia. 9        (124) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 10    by the Village of Lake Zurich.11        (125) If the ordinance was adopted on September 23, 12    1997 by the City of Granite City. 13        (126) If the ordinance was adopted on May 8, 2013 by 14    the Village of Rosemont to create the Higgins Road/River 15    Road TIF District No. 6. 16        (127) If the ordinance was adopted on November 22, 17    1993 by the City of Arcola. 18        (128) If the ordinance was adopted on September 7, 19    2004 by the City of Arcola. 20        (129) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 21    1999 by the City of Paris. 22        (130) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 23    1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the U.S. Route 6 East 24    Ottawa TIF. 25        (131) If the ordinance was adopted on May 2, 2002 by 26    the Village of Crestwood.   HB1441 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (132) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1992 2    by the City of Blue Island. 3        (133) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 4    1993 by the City of Lacon. 5        (134) If the ordinance was adopted on May 4, 1998 by 6    the Village of Bradford. 7        (135) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 8    the City of Oak Forest. 9        (136) If the ordinance was adopted on November 16, 10    1992 by the City of Pinckneyville. 11        (137) If the ordinance was adopted on March 1, 2001 by 12    the Village of South Jacksonville. 13        (138) If the ordinance was adopted on February 26, 14    1992 by the City of Chicago to create the Stockyards 15    Southeast Quadrant TIF District.16        (139) If the ordinance was adopted on January 25, 1993 17    by the City of LaSalle.18        (140) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 19    1997 by the Village of Dieterich. 20        (141) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 21    2016 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 22    Balmoral/Pearl TIF No. 8 Tax Increment Financing 23    Redevelopment Project Area. 24        (142) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 25    the City of Oak Forest.26        (143) If the ordinance was adopted on January 31, 1995   HB1441 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    by the Village of Milledgeville. 2        (144) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1996 3    by the Village of Pearl City. 4        (145) If the ordinance was adopted on December 21, 5    1994 by the City of Calumet City.6        (146) If the ordinance was adopted on May 5, 2003 by 7    the Town of Normal. 8        (147) If the ordinance was adopted on June 2, 1998 by 9    the City of Litchfield. 10        (148) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 1995 11    by the City of Marion. 12        (149) If the ordinance was adopted on May 24, 2001 by 13    the Village of Hanover Park. 14        (150) If the ordinance was adopted on May 30, 1995 by 15    the Village of Dalzell. 16        (151) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 1997 17    by the City of Edwardsville. 18        (152) If the ordinance was adopted on September 5, 19    1995 by the City of Granite City. 20        (153) If the ordinance was adopted on June 21, 1999 by 21    the Village of Table Grove. 22        (154) If the ordinance was adopted on February 23, 23    1995 by the City of Springfield. 24        (155) If the ordinance was adopted on August 11, 1999 25    by the City of Monmouth. 26        (156) If the ordinance was adopted on December 26,   HB1441 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    1995 by the Village of Posen. 2        (157) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1995 by 3    the Village of Caseyville. 4        (158) If the ordinance was adopted on January 30, 1996 5    by the City of Madison. 6        (159) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1996 7    by the Village of Hartford. 8        (160) If the ordinance was adopted on July 2, 1996 by 9    the Village of Manlius. 10        (161) If the ordinance was adopted on March 21, 2000 11    by the City of Hoopeston.12        (162) If the ordinance was adopted on March 22, 2005 13    by the City of Hoopeston.14        (163) If the ordinance was adopted on July 10, 1996 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Goose Island TIF 16    District.17        (164) If the ordinance was adopted on December 11, 18    1996 by the City of Chicago to create the Bryn 19    Mawr/Broadway TIF District.20        (165) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 21    1995 by the City of Chicago to create the 95th/Western TIF 22    District.23        (166) If the ordinance was adopted on October 7, 1998 24    by the City of Chicago to create the 71st and Stony Island 25    TIF District.26        (167) If the ordinance was adopted on April 19, 1995   HB1441 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    by the Village of North Utica.2        (168) If the ordinance was adopted on April 22, 1996 3    by the City of LaSalle.4        (169) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 2008 by 5    the City of Country Club Hills. 6        (170) If the ordinance was adopted on July 3, 1996 by 7    the Village of Phoenix.8        (171) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1997 by 9    the Village of Swansea.10        (172) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2001 11    by the Village of Saunemin.12        (173) If the ordinance was adopted on January 10, 2005 13    by the Village of Romeoville. 14        (174) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 15    by the City of Berwyn for the South Berwyn Corridor Tax 16    Increment Financing District.17        (175) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 18    by the City of Berwyn for the Roosevelt Road Tax Increment 19    Financing District.20        (176) If the ordinance was adopted on May 3, 2001 by 21    the Village of Hanover Park for the Village Center Tax 22    Increment Financing Redevelopment Project Area (TIF # 3).23        (177) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 1996 24    by the City of Savanna. 25        (178) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2002 26    by the Village of Okawville.  HB1441 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (179) If the ordinance was adopted on October 4, 1999 2    by the City of Vandalia.3        (180) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2003 by 4    the City of Rushville.5        (181) If the ordinance was adopted on December 7, 1998 6    by the City of Quincy for the Central Business District 7    West Tax Increment Redevelopment Project Area. 8        (182) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 9    by the Village of Maywood approving the Roosevelt Road TIF 10    District. 11        (183) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 12    by the Village of Maywood approving the Madison 13    Street/Fifth Avenue TIF District. 14        (184) If the ordinance was adopted on November 10, 15    1997 by the Village of Park Forest. 16        (185) If the ordinance was adopted on July 30, 1997 by 17    the City of Chicago to create the Near North TIF district. 18        (186) If the ordinance was adopted on December 1, 2000 19    by the Village of Mahomet. 20        (187) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 1999 by 21    the Village of Washburn. 22        (188) If the ordinance was adopted on August 19, 1998 23    by the Village of New Berlin. 24        (189) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 25    by the City of Highwood. 26        (190) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1997 by   HB1441 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    the City of Flora. 2        (191) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 1999 3    by the City of Ottawa. 4        (192) If the ordinance was adopted on June 13, 2005 by 5    the City of Mount Carroll. 6        (193) If the ordinance was adopted on March 25, 2008 7    by the Village of Elizabeth. 8        (194) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 9    2000 by the City of Mount Pulaski. 10        (195) If the ordinance was adopted on November 21, 11    2000 by the City of Effingham.12        (196) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2003 13    by the City of Effingham. 14        (197) If the ordinance was adopted on February 4, 2008 15    by the City of Polo. 16        (198) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 2005 17    by the Village of Bellwood to create the Park Place TIF.18        (199) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 19    the Village of Bellwood to create the North-2014 TIF.20        (200) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 21    the Village of Bellwood to create the South-2014 TIF.22        (201) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 23    the Village of Bellwood to create the Central Metro-2014 24    TIF.25        (202) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 26    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison   HB1441 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    Creek "A" (Southwest)-2014 TIF.2        (203) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 3    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 4    Creek "B" (Northwest)-2014 TIF.5        (204) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 6    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 7    Creek "C" (Northeast)-2014 TIF.8        (205) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 9    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 10    Creek "D" (Southeast)-2014 TIF.11        (206) If the ordinance was adopted on June 26, 2007 by 12    the City of Peoria.13        (207) If the ordinance was adopted on October 28, 2008 14    by the City of Peoria. 15        (208) If the ordinance was adopted on April 4, 2000 by 16    the City of Joliet to create the Joliet City Center TIF 17    District. 18        (209) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 19    the City of Chicago to create the 43rd/Cottage Grove TIF 20    district. 21        (210) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 22    the City of Chicago to create the 79th Street Corridor TIF 23    district. 24        (211) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 25    by the City of Chicago to create the Bronzeville TIF 26    district.   HB1441 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (212) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 2    by the City of Chicago to create the Homan/Arthington TIF 3    district. 4        (213) If the ordinance was adopted on December 8, 1998 5    by the Village of Plainfield. 6        (214) If the ordinance was adopted on July 17, 2000 by 7    the Village of Homer.8        (215) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 9    2006 by the City of Greenville.10        (216) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 11    the City of Chicago to create the Kinzie Industrial TIF 12    district.13        (217) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1998 14    by the City of Chicago to create the Northwest Industrial 15    TIF district.16        (218) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 17    the City of Chicago to create the Pilsen Industrial TIF 18    district.19        (219) If the ordinance was adopted on January 14, 1997 20    by the City of Chicago to create the 35th/Halsted TIF 21    district.22        (220) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 1999 by 23    the City of Chicago to create the Pulaski Corridor TIF 24    district. 25        (221) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 26    1997 by the City of Springfield to create the Enos Park   HB1441 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    Neighborhood TIF District. 2        (222) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 3    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Cicero 4    redevelopment project area. 5        (223) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 6    by the City of Chicago to create the Western/Ogden 7    redevelopment project area. 8        (224) If the ordinance was adopted on July 21, 1999 by 9    the City of Chicago to create the 24th/Michigan Avenue 10    redevelopment project area. 11        (225) If the ordinance was adopted on January 20, 1999 12    by the City of Chicago to create the Woodlawn 13    redevelopment project area. 14        (226) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Clark/Montrose 16    redevelopment project area. 17        (227) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 2003 18    by the City of Madison to create the Rivers Edge 19    redevelopment project area. 20        (228) If the ordinance was adopted on August 12, 2003 21    by the City of Madison to create the Caine Street 22    redevelopment project area. 23        (229) If the ordinance was adopted on March 7, 2000 by 24    the City of Madison to create the East Madison TIF. 25        (230) If the ordinance was adopted on August 3, 2001 26    by the Village of Aviston.   HB1441 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (231) If the ordinance was adopted on August 22, 2011 2    by the Village of Warren. 3        (232) If the ordinance was adopted on April 8, 1999 by 4    the City of Farmer City.5        (233) If the ordinance was adopted on August 4, 1999 6    by the Village of Fairmont City.7        (234) If the ordinance was adopted on October 2, 1999 8    by the Village of Fairmont City. 9        (235) If the ordinance was adopted December 16, 1999 10    by the City of Springfield. 11        (236) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 12    1999 by the Village of Palatine to create the Village of 13    Palatine Downtown Area TIF District.14        (237) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 15    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the 111th/Kedzie 16    redevelopment project area.17        (238) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 18    1998 by the City of Chicago to create the Canal/Congress 19    redevelopment project area.20        (239) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 21    the City of Chicago to create the Galewood/Armitage 22    Industrial redevelopment project area.23        (240) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 24    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the Madison/Austin 25    Corridor redevelopment project area.26        (241) If the ordinance was adopted on April 12, 2000   HB1441 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    by the City of Chicago to create the South Chicago 2    redevelopment project area. 3        (242) If the ordinance was adopted on January 9, 2002 4    by the Village of Elkhart. 5        (243) If the ordinance was adopted on May 23, 2000 by 6    the City of Robinson to create the West Robinson 7    Industrial redevelopment project area. 8        (244) If the ordinance was adopted on October 9, 2001 9    by the City of Robinson to create the Downtown Robinson 10    redevelopment project area. 11        (245) If the ordinance was adopted on September 19, 12    2000 by the Village of Valmeyer. 13        (246) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 2002 14    by the City of McHenry to create the Downtown TIF 15    district. 16        (247) If the ordinance was adopted on February 15, 17    1999 by the Village of Channahon. 18        (248) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 19    2000 by the City of Peoria. 20        (249) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 2000 by 21    the City of Rock Island to create the North 11th Street 22    redevelopment project area.23        (250) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 24    by the City of Champaign to create the North Campustown 25    TIF. 26        (251) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20,   HB1441 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    2000 by the Village of Evergreen Park. 2        (252) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 3    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the 4    Fullerton/Milwaukee redevelopment project area. 5        (253) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 2006 6    by the Village of Bourbonnais to create the Bourbonnais 7    Industrial Park Conservation Area.8        (254) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 9    2000 by the City of Geneva to create the East State Street 10    redevelopment project area.11        (255) If the ordinance was adopted on February 6, 2001 12    by the Village of Downers Grove to create the Ogden Avenue 13    redevelopment project area.14        (256) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 15    the City of Chicago to create the Division/Homan 16    redevelopment project area.17        (257) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000 by 18    the City of Chicago to create the 63rd/Pulaski 19    redevelopment project area.20        (258) If the ordinance was adopted on March 10, 1999 21    by the City of Chicago to create the Greater Southwest 22    Industrial (East) redevelopment project area.23        (259) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 24    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Kedzie 25    redevelopment project area.26        (260) If the ordinance was adopted on November 3, 1999   HB1441 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    by the City of Chicago to create the Lincoln Avenue 2    redevelopment project area.3        (261) If the ordinance was adopted on September 3, 4    2015 by the Village of Fox River Grove to create the 5    Downtown TIF #2 redevelopment project area. 6        (262) If the ordinance was adopted on October 16, 2000 7    by the Village of Franklin Park to create the Downtown 8    Franklin Avenue redevelopment project area.9        (263) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 10    2003 by the City of Jacksonville to create the Downtown 11    Redevelopment Project Area.12        (264) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2002 13    by the City of Prophetstown to create the Redevelopment 14    Project Area No. 1.15        (265) If the ordinance was adopted on August 29, 2006 16    by the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Dayton 17    Industrial TIF District.18        (266) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2006 by 19    the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Canal TIF 20    District.21        (267) If the ordinance was adopted on March 5, 2001 by 22    the City of Salem to create the TIF No 2 - Redevelopment 23    Area.24        (268) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 2002 25    by the Village of Malta to create the Harkness Property 26    redevelopment project area.  HB1441 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (269) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2008 by 2    the City of Highland to create TIF #1.3        (270) If the ordinance was adopted on January 3, 2012 4    by the City of Highland to create TIF #2.5        (271) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 2000 6    by the City of Chicago to create the Belmont/Central 7    redevelopment project area.8        (272) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 9    the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Neighborhood 10    redevelopment project area.11        (273) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 12    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lake Calumet Area 13    Industrial redevelopment project area.14        (274) If the ordinance was adopted on October 15, 2001 15    by the City of Des Plaines to create TIF No. 6 Mannheim 16    Higgins Road. 17        (275) If the ordinance was adopted on October 22, 2001 18    by the City of Sullivan to create TIF District III. 19        (276) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 20    2013 by the City of Oak Forest to create the City of Oak 21    Forest Cicero Avenue Tax Increment Financing District 22    Redevelopment Project Area TIF District #6. 23        (277) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 24    2003 by the City of Knoxville.25        (278) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 26    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Peterson/Pulaski   HB1441 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    redevelopment project area.2        (279) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 3    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Central West 4    redevelopment project area.5        (280) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 6    the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Broadway 7    redevelopment project area.8        (281) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 9    by the City of St. Charles for the First Street District 10    #4.11        (282) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 12    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Seniors First 13    TIF.14        (283) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 15    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Zenith Opus TIF. 16        (284) If the ordinance was adopted on June 24, 2003 by 17    the City of Lewistown to create Lewistown TIF District 1. 18        (285) If the ordinance was adopted on April 10, 2002 19    by the City of Elgin to create the Central Area TIF 20    Redevelopment Project Area.21        (286) If the ordinance was adopted on February 17, 22    2004 by the City of Carbondale to create TIF Redevelopment 23    Project Area #1.24        (287) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2008 by 25    the City of Pittsfield to create Pittsfield TIF District 26    #1.   HB1441 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (288) If the ordinance was adopted on June 22, 2005 by 2    the City of Fairview Heights to create the Shoppes of St. 3    Clair Redevelopment Area. 4        (289) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 5    by the City of Fairview Heights to create the Lincoln 6    Trail Redevelopment Area. 7        (290) If the ordinance was adopted on May 7, 2008 by 8    the City of Vienna to create Vienna TIF #1.9        (291) If the ordinance was adopted on August 8, 2000 10    by the Village of Lyons to create Village of Lyons TIF 11    District #1 (North Ogden).12        (292) If the ordinance was adopted on August 8, 2000 13    by the Village of Lyons to create Village of Lyons TIF 14    District #2 (South Ogden/Joliet).15        (293) If the ordinance was adopted on March 20, 2002 16    by the Village of Bridgeview to create Bridgeview Harlem 17    Avenue TIF District #1. 18        (294) (284) If the ordinance was adopted on January 19    16, 2002 by the City of Chicago to create the 20    Roseland/Michigan redevelopment project area.21        (295) (285) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22    27, 2002 by the City of Chicago to create the 23    Chicago/Central Park redevelopment project area.24        (296) (286) If the ordinance was adopted on July 31, 25    2002 by the City of Chicago to create the Avalon 26    Park/South Shore redevelopment project area.  HB1441 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (297) (287) If the ordinance was adopted on November 2    13, 2002 by the City of Chicago to create the Commercial 3    Avenue redevelopment project area.4        (298) (288) If the ordinance was adopted on December 5    1, 2003 by the Village of Millstadt to create Millstadt 6    TIF District #1.7        (299) (289) If the ordinance was adopted on December 8    16, 2003 by the City of Mattoon to create the Midtown 9    Mattoon redevelopment project area.10        (300) (290) If the ordinance was adopted on January 11    21, 2003 by the City of Sterling to create the Rock River 12    Redevelopment. 13        (301) If the ordinance was adopted on July 31, 2006 by 14    the City of Spring Valley to create Spring Valley TIF 15    District I.16        (302) If the ordinance was adopted on August 10, 2010 17    by the Village of Bedford Park to create the 65th Street 18    TIF District.19        (303) If the ordinance was adopted on March 2, 2015 by 20    the Village of Lisle to create Downtown TIF District #3.21        (304) If the ordinance was adopted on October 18, 2010 22    by the City of Mt. Vernon to create the Route 15 Interstate 23    57 TIF District.24        (305) If the ordinance was adopted on May 3, 2003 by 25    the Village of Hoffman Estates to create the Golf, 26    Higgins, and Roselle Road TIF District.  HB1441 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (306) If the ordinance was adopted on June 23, 2003 by 2    the City of Centralia to create TIF District #3.3        (307) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 2006 4    by the City of Paris to create the Jasper TIF District.5        (308) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2003 by 6    the Village of Summit.7        (309) If the ordinance was adopted on May 9, 2009 by 8    the Village of Mokena to create the Project Area #1.9        (310) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 10    2003 by the Village of Seneca to create the Shipyard Road 11    TIF District.12        (311) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 13    2003 by the Village of Seneca to create the Old Stage Road 14    TIF District.15        (312) If the ordinance was adopted on July 9, 2002 by 16    the Town of Cicero to create Laramie and 25th Street TIF 17    District No. 2.18        (313) If the ordinance was adopted on December 14, 19    2004 by the Town of Cicero to create 54th Avenue TIF 20    District No. 3.21        (314) If the ordinance was adopted on September 2, 22    2003 by the Village of South Holland to create the 23    Downtown TIF District. 24    (d) For redevelopment project areas for which bonds were 25issued before July 29, 1991, or for which contracts were 26entered into before June 1, 1988, in connection with a   HB1441 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1redevelopment project in the area within the State Sales Tax 2Boundary, the estimated dates of completion of the 3redevelopment project and retirement of obligations to finance 4redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 5Section 11-74.4-7) may be extended by municipal ordinance to 6December 31, 2013. The termination procedures of subsection 7(b) of Section 11-74.4-8 are not required for these 8redevelopment project areas in 2009 but are required in 2013. 9The extension allowed by Public Act 87-1272 shall not apply to 10real property tax increment allocation financing under Section 1111-74.4-8.12    (e) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 13increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 14only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 15project areas that were adopted on or after December 16, 1986 16and for which at least $8 million worth of municipal bonds were 17authorized on or after December 19, 1989 but before January 1, 181990; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 19of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 20of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 21written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 22constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 23project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.24    (f) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 25increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 26only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment   HB1441 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1project areas that were established on or after December 1, 21981 but before January 1, 1982 and for which at least 3$1,500,000 worth of tax increment revenue bonds were 4authorized on or after September 30, 1990 but before July 1, 51991; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 6of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 7of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 8written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 9constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 10project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.11    (f-1) (Blank). 12    (f-2) (Blank). 13    (f-3) (Blank). 14    (f-5) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 15increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 16only, shall be not more than 47 years for redevelopment 17project areas listed in this subsection; provided that (i) the 18municipality adopts an ordinance extending the life of the 19redevelopment project area to 47 years and (ii) the 20municipality provides notice to the taxing bodies that would 21otherwise constitute the joint review board for the 22redevelopment project area not more than 30 and not less than 2314 days prior to the adoption of that ordinance: 24        (1) If the redevelopment project area was established 25    on December 29, 1981 by the City of Springfield. 26        (2) If the redevelopment project area was established   HB1441 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Morris and that is 2    known as the Morris TIF District 1. 3        (3) If the redevelopment project area was established 4    on December 31, 1986 by the Village of Cahokia. 5        (4) If the redevelopment project area was established 6    on December 20, 1986 by the City of Charleston. 7        (5) If the redevelopment project area was established 8    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Beardstown. 9        (6) If the redevelopment project area was established 10    on December 23, 1986 by the Town of Cicero. 11        (7) If the redevelopment project area was established 12    on December 29, 1986 by the City of East St. Louis. 13        (8) If the redevelopment project area was established 14    on January 23, 1991 by the City of East St. Louis. 15        (9) If the redevelopment project area was established 16    on December 29, 1986 by the Village of Gardner. 17        (10) If the redevelopment project area was established 18    on June 11, 2002 by the City of East Peoria to create the 19    West Washington Street TIF. 20        (11) If the redevelopment project area was established 21    on December 22, 1986 by the City of Washington creating 22    the Washington Square TIF #2.23        (12) If the redevelopment project area was established 24    on November 11, 1986 by the City of Pekin.25        (13) If the redevelopment project area was established 26    on December 30, 1986 by the City of Belleville.   HB1441 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 2    the City of Chicago Heights. 3        (15) If the redevelopment project area was established 4    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I 5    (the Main St TIF). 6        (16) If the redevelopment project area was established 7    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF 8    II (the Interstate TIF). 9        (17) If the redevelopment project area was established 10    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Sparta to create TIF 11    #1. Any termination procedures provided for in Section 12    11-74.4-8 are not required for this redevelopment project 13    area prior to the 47th calendar year after the year in 14    which the ordinance approving the redevelopment project 15    year was adopted. 16        (18) If the redevelopment project area was established 17    on March 30, 1992 by the Village of Ohio to create the 18    Village of Ohio TIF District.19        (19) If the redevelopment project area was established 20    on December 13, 1993 by the Village of Crete.21        (20) If the redevelopment project area was established 22    on February 12, 2001 by the Village of Crete.23        (21) If the redevelopment project area was established 24    on April 23, 2001 by the Village of Crete.25        (22) If the redevelopment project area was established 26    on December 29, 1993 by the City of Ottawa to create the   HB1441 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1    Ottawa I-80 North TIF District.2        (23) If the redevelopment project area was established 3    on September 20, 1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the 4    Ottawa Rt. 6 East TIF District.5        (24) If the redevelopment project area was established 6    on January 6, 1999 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 7    Village of Rosemont TIF 4 South River Road.8        (25) If the redevelopment project area was established 9    on December 20, 1988 by the Village of Lansing.10        (26) If the redevelopment project area was established 11    on November 20, 1989 by the Village of South Holland.12        (27) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on December 11, 1989 by the Village of Melrose Park to 14    create the Mid-Metros TIF. 15        (28) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1993 16    by the City of Lacon to create the City of Lacon TIF 17    District I.18    (g) In consolidating the material relating to completion 19dates from Sections 11-74.4-3 and 11-74.4-7 into this Section, 20it is not the intent of the General Assembly to make any 21substantive change in the law, except for the extension of the 22completion dates for the City of Aurora, the Village of Milan, 23the City of West Frankfort, the Village of Libertyville, and 24the Village of Hoffman Estates set forth under items (67), 25(68), (69), (70), and (71) of subsection (c) of this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 103-315, eff. 7-28-23; 103-575, eff. 12-8-23;   HB1441 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 06683 BAB 16719 b1103-1016, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1058, eff. 12-31-24; 104-322, eff. 28-15-25; 104-452, eff. 12-12-25; revised 1-11-26.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.